North Dakota statutes. TITLE 32 Judicial Remedies
CHAPTER 32-47 Landowner Immunity for Trespasser Injury

32-47-01.
Duty of care to trespasser.

A possessor of land, including an owner, lessee, or other occupant, does not owe a duty of care to a trespasser and is not subject to liability for any injury to a trespasser.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 248, § 1.

Effective Date.

This chapter became effective August 1, 2011.

32-47-02.
Exceptions to land possessor immunity.

Notwithstanding 32-47-01, a possessor of land may be subject to liability for physical injury or death to a trespasser in the following situations:

A land possessor has a duty not to harm the trespasser in a willful and wanton manner, except as permitted under section 12.1-05-06, 12.1-05-07, 12.1-05-07.1, or 12.1-05-07.2;

A land possessor that knows of the trespasser’s presence on the premises has a duty to exercise ordinary care to avoid injuring that trespasser; and

A land possessor may be subject to liability for physical injury or death to a child trespasser resulting from an artificial condition on the land if:

The possessor knew or had reason to know that children were likely to trespass at the location of the condition;

The condition is one the possessor knew or reasonably should have known involved an unreasonable risk of death or serious bodily harm to children;

The injured child did not discover the condition or realize the risk involved in the condition or coming within the area made dangerous by it;

The utility to the possessor of maintaining the condition and the burden of eliminating the danger were slight as compared with the risk to the child involved; and

The land possessor failed to exercise reasonable care to eliminate the danger or otherwise protect the injured child.

For purposes of this subsection, “artificial condition” means a structure or other manmade condition and does not include living animals.

This section does not affect chapter 53-08.

This section does not create or increase the liability of any person or entity.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 248, § 2.